Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-607
Participant; duty to exercise due care.

Nothing in the Nebraska Agritourism Promotion Act limits the obligation of a participant entering upon or using premises of another for agritourism activities to exercise due care in his or her use of such premises and in his or her agritourism activities on the premises.

Laws 2015, LB329, § 7.